Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1112.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 289, O.S.L.
2023 (70 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 18-114.15), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 18-114.15. A. Beginning with the 2023-2024 2025-2026
school year, certified personnel, as defined in Section 26-103 of
Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes, in the public schools of Oklahoma
shall receive in salary and/or fringe benefits not less than the
amounts specified in the following schedule:
MINIMUM SALARY SCHEDULE
National
Req. No. 11031 Page 1

Years of Bachelor's Board Master's Doctor's
Experience Degree Certification Degree Degree
0 $39,601 $40,759 $40,991 $42,381
1 $40,035 $41,193 $41,425 $42,815
2 $40,469 $41,628 $41,859 $43,249
3 $40,904 $42,062 $42,294 $43,684
4 $41,338 $42,496 $42,728 $44,118
5 $42,810 $43,968 $44,200 $45,590
6 $43,273 $44,432 $44,663 $46,054
7 $43,737 $44,895 $45,127 $46,517
8 $44,200 $45,358 $45,590 $46,980
9 $44,663 $45,822 $46,054 $47,444
10 $46,684 $47,844 $48,568 $50,945
11 $47,177 $48,336 $49,061 $51,438
12 $47,670 $48,829 $49,554 $51,931
13 $48,162 $49,322 $50,047 $52,424
14 $48,655 $49,815 $50,539 $52,916
15 $50,167 $51,327 $52,052 $54,430
16 $50,660 $51,820 $52,545 $54,923
17 $51,153 $52,313 $53,038 $55,416
18 $51,646 $52,806 $53,531 $55,909
19 $52,139 $53,299 $54,024 $56,402
20 $52,652 $53,813 $54,538 $56,917
21 $53,145 $54,306 $55,031 $57,410
Req. No. 11031 Page 2

22 $53,639 $54,799 $55,524 $57,903
23 $54,132 $55,292 $56,018 $58,397
24 $54,625 $55,785 $56,511 $58,890
25 $56,049 $57,232 $57,971 $60,395
0 $44,601 $45,759 $45,991 $47,381
1 $45,035 $46,193 $46,425 $47,815
2 $45,469 $46,628 $46,859 $48,249
3 $45,904 $47,062 $47,294 $48,684
4 $46,338 $47,496 $47,728 $49,118
5 $47,810 $48,968 $49,200 $50,590
6 $48,273 $49,432 $49,663 $51,054
7 $48,737 $49,895 $50,127 $51,517
8 $49,200 $50,358 $50,590 $51,980
9 $49,663 $50,822 $51,054 $52,444
10 $51,684 $52,844 $53,568 $55,945
11 $52,177 $53,336 $54,061 $56,438
12 $52,670 $53,829 $54,554 $56,931
13 $53,162 $54,322 $55,047 $57,424
14 $53,655 $54,815 $55,539 $57,916
15 $55,167 $56,327 $57,052 $59,430
16 $55,660 $56,820 $57,545 $59,923
17 $56,153 $57,313 $58,038 $60,416
18 $56,646 $57,806 $58,531 $60,909
19 $57,139 $58,299 $59,024 $61,402
Req. No. 11031 Page 3

20 $57,652 $58,813 $59,538 $61,917
21 $58,145 $59,306 $60,031 $62,410
22 $58,639 $59,799 $60,524 $62,903
23 $59,132 $60,292 $61,018 $63,397
24 $59,625 $60,785 $61,511 $63,890
25 $61,049 $62,232 $63,971 $65,395
Master's Degree +
Years of National Board
Experience Certification
0 $42,149
1 $42,583
2 $43,018
3 $43,452
4 $43,886
5 $45,358
6 $45,822
7 $46,285
8 $46,749
9 $47,212
10 $49,728
11 $50,221
12 $50,713
13 $51,206
14 $51,699
Req. No. 11031 Page 4

15 $53,212
16 $53,705
17 $54,198
18 $54,691
19 $55,184
20 $55,698
21 $56,192
22 $56,685
23 $57,178
24 $57,671
25 $59,153
0 $47,149
1 $47,583
2 $48,018
3 $48,452
4 $48,886
5 $50,358
6 $50,822
7 $51,285
8 $51,749
9 $52,212
10 $54,728
11 $55,221
12 $55,713
Req. No. 11031 Page 5

13 $56,206
14 $57,699
15 $58,212
16 $58,705
17 $59,198
18 $59,691
19 $60,184
20 $60,698
21 $61,192
22 $61,685
23 $62,178
24 $62,671
25 $64,153
B. 1. When determining the Minimum Salary Schedule, "fringe
benefits" shall mean all or part of retirement benefits, excluding
the contributions made pursuant to subsection A of Section 17-108.1
of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes and the flexible benefit
allowance pursuant to Section 26-105 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma
Statutes from the flexible benefit allowance funds disbursed by the
State Board of Education and the State Board of Career and
Technology Education pursuant to Section 26-104 of Title 70 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
2. If a school district intends to provide retirement benefits
to a teacher such that the teacher's salary would be less than the
Req. No. 11031 Page 6

amou nts set forth in the minimum salary schedule specified in
subsection A of this section, the district shall be required to
provide written notification to the teacher prior to his or her
employment or, if already employed by the district, no later than
thirty (30) days prior to the date the district elects to provide
retirement benefits such that the teacher's salary would be less
than the minimum salary schedule.
C. Any of the degrees referred to in this section shall be from
a college recognized by the State Board of Education. The Board
shall accept teaching experience from out-of-state school districts
that are accredited by the State Board of Education or appropriate
state accrediting agency for the districts. The Board shall accept
teaching experience from out-of-country schools that are accredited
or otherwise endorsed by the appropriate national or regional
accrediting or endorsement authority. Out-of-country certification
documentation in a language other than English shall be analyzed by
an educational credential evaluation service in accordance with
industry standards and guidelines and approved by the State
Department of Education. The person seeking to have credit granted
for out-of-country teaching experience shall be responsible for all
costs of the analysis by a credential evaluation service. The Board
shall accept teaching experience from primary and secondary schools
that are operated by the United States Department of Defense or are
affiliated with the United States Department of State.
Req. No. 11031 Page 7

D. For the purpose of state salary increments and retirement,
no teacher shall be granted credit for more than five (5) years of
active duty in the military service or out-of-state or out-of-
country teaching experience as a certified teacher or its
equivalent. Nothing in this section shall prohibit boards of
education from crediting more years of experience on district salary
schedules than those allowed for state purposes.
E. The State Board of Education shall recognize, for purposes
of certification and salary increments, all the years of experience
of a:
1. Certified teacher who teaches in the educational program of
the Department of Corrections, beginning with fiscal year 1981;
2. Vocational rehabilitation counselor under the Department of
Human Services if the counselor was employed as a certified teacher
by the State Department of Education when the Division of Vocational
Rehabilitation was transferred from the State Board of Career and
Technology Education or the State Board of Education to the Oklahoma
Public Welfare Commission on July 1, 1968;
3. Vocational rehabilitation counselor which were completed
while employed by the Department of Human Services if such counselor
was certified as a teacher or was eligible for certification as a
teacher in Oklahoma;


Req. No. 11031 Page 8

4. Certified teacher which were completed while employed by the
Child Study Center located at University Hospital, if the teacher
was certified as a teacher in Oklahoma; and
5. Certified school psychologist or psychometrist which were
completed while employed as a doctoral intern, psychological
assistant, or psychologist with any agency of the State of Oklahoma
if the experience primarily involved work with persons of school- or
preschool-age and if the person was, at the time the experience was
acquired, certified as, or eligible for certification as, a school
psychologist or psychometrist.
F. The provisions of this section shall not apply to teachers
who have entered into postretirement employment with a public school
in Oklahoma and are still receiving a monthly retirement benefit.
G. If a person employed as certified personnel, as defined in
Section 26-103 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes, by a school
district during the 2022-2023 2024-2025 school year was receiving a
salary above the step level indicated by the State Minimum Salary
Schedule for the 2022-2023 2024-2025 school year, the person shall
receive a salary increase amount equal to the amount indicated in
subsection A for the step level indicated for the person, provided
they remain employed by the same district, unless the hours or the
duties of the certified personnel are reduced proportionately.
H. If a school district does not receive Foundation or Salary
Incentive Aid pursuant to Section 18-200.1 of Title 70 of the
Req. No. 11031 Page 9

Okla homa Statutes, funds shall be allocated by the State Board of
Education to implement the salary increases indicated in subsection
A of this section.
I. Persons employed as classroom instructional employees of
technology center school districts supervised by the State Board of
Career and Technology Education shall receive a salary increase
amount equal to the amount indicated in subsection A of this section
for the step level indicated for the person, provided they remain
employed by the same technology center school district, unless the
hours or the duties of the classroom instructional employees are
reduced proportionately.
J. Persons employed as correctional teachers or vocational
instructors by the Department of Corrections pursuant to Section
510.6a of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes or persons employed as
teachers by the Office of Juvenile Affairs shall receive a salary
increase amount equal to the amount indicated in subsection A of
this section for the step level indicated for the person, provided
they remain employed by the same Department of Corrections or Office
of Juvenile Affairs facility, unless the hours or the duties of the
correctional teachers, vocational instructors, or teachers are
reduced proportionately.
K. Persons employed as teachers by the State Department of
Rehabilitation Services shall receive a salary increase amount equal
to the amount indicated in subsection A of this section for the step
Req. No. 11031 Page 10

leve l indicated for the person, provided they remain employed by the
State Department of Rehabilitation Services, unless the hours or the
duties of the teachers are reduced proportionately.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 6-101.42, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 6-101.42. A. For the 2025-2026 school year, each
school district shall provide to every support employee, as defined
in paragraph 8 of Section 1-116 of this title, a six-percent wage
increase over the base amount the employee earned during the 2024-
2025 school year if the support employee is employed by the same
school district for the 2025-2026 school year. The dollar amount of
the salary increase required by this subsection shall be prorated
based upon the number of total hours of work performed by a full-
time-equivalent support employee. If a support employee is a new
employee of the school district, his or her starting salary shall be
a six-percent increase from the starting salary for the same
position during the 2024-2025 school year.
B. For the 2018-19 school year, each school district shall
provide to every support employee a wage increase over the base
amount the employee earned during the 2017-18 school year if the
support employee is employed by the same school district for the
2018-19 school year in the amount of One Thousand Two Hundred Fifty
Dollars ($1,250.00). The dollar amount of salary increase
authorized by this subsection shall be prorated based upon the
Req. No. 11031 Page 11

numb er of total hours of work performed by a full-time-equivalent
support employee.
B. C. The increase increases prescribed by this section shall
be in addition to any other compensation, increase in compensation,
and fringe benefits provided by the district or state, or mandated
by law or collective bargaining agreement, unless the hours or
duties of the support employee are reduced proportionately.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-11031 AQH 12/16/24










Req. No. 11031 Page 12